Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2524.02
State Court Administrator; criminal homicide report; provide forms.

The State Court Administrator shall provide all forms necessary to carry out sections 29-2524.01 and 29-2524.02.

Laws 1978, LB 749, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2524.02 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.